Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-370
Withdrawal value, defined.

Withdrawal value shall mean the amount paid to an association on a savings deposit plus earnings credited to such account or deposit less lawful deductions.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 15.